California statutes. Labor Code
(B) Within 120 days of receipt of the notice of the request for information,
 the refinery employer obtains an order prohibiting disclosure of the information to the public and promptly notifies the division of that action.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to allow a refinery employer to refuse to disclose the information required pursuant to this section to the division.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any information that has been designated as a trade secret by a refinery employer shall not be released to any member of the public, except that the information may be disclosed to other officers or employees of the division when relevant in any proceeding of the division.

(e) (1) The refinery employer filing an action pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (c) shall provide notice of the action to the person requesting the release of the information at the same time that the defendant in the action is served.

(2) A person who has requested the release of information that includes information that the refinery employer has notified the division is a trade secret pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) may intervene in an action by the refinery employer filed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). The court shall permit that person to intervene.

(f) The public agency shall not bear the court costs for any party named in litigation filed pursuant to this section.

(g) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the exchange of trade secrets between
 local, state, or federal public agencies or state officials when those trade secrets are relevant and reasonably necessary to the exercise of their authority.

(h) If the person requesting the release of information identified by a refinery employer as a trade secret files an action against the division to order disclosure of that information, the division shall promptly notify the refinery employer in writing of the action by certified mail, return receipt requested. The refinery employer may intervene in an action filed by the person requesting the release of trade secrets identified by the refinery employer. The court shall permit the refinery employer to intervene.

(i) An officer or employee of the division who, by virtue of that employment or official position, has possession of,
 or has access to, trade secret information, and who, knowing that disclosure of the information to the general public is prohibited by this section, knowingly and willfully discloses the information in any manner to a person that the officer or employee knows is not entitled to receive it, is guilty of a misdemeanor. A contractor with the division and an employee of the contractor, who has been furnished information as authorized by this section, shall be considered an employee of the division for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 978, Sec. 7.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. AMUSEMENT RIDES SAFETY LAW [7900. - 7919.]

7900.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Amusement Rides Safety Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7901.

As used in this part:

(a) “Amusement ride” means a mechanical device which carries or conveys passengers along, around, or over a fixed or restricted route or course for the purpose of giving its passengers amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement. “Amusement ride” includes the business of operating bungee jumping services or providing services to facilitate bungee jumping, but does not include slides, playground equipment, coin-operated devices or conveyances which operate directly on the ground or on the surface or pavement directly on the ground or the operation of amusement devices of a permanent nature. The division shall determine the specific devices which are amusement rides for the purposes of this part. This determination shall be made to apply equally to all operators of similar or identical rides and shall be made pursuant to a procedure promulgated by the standards board.

(b) “Operator” or “owner” means a person who owns or controls or has the duty to control the operation of an amusement ride. It includes the state and every state agency, and each county, city, district, and all public and quasi-public corporations and public agencies therein.

(c) “Permit” means a document issued by the division which indicates that an inspection of the ride has been performed pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7902.

The division shall promulgate and formulate rules and regulations for adoption by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board for the safe installation, repair, maintenance, use, operation, and inspection of all amusement rides as the division finds necessary for the protection of the general public using amusement rides. The rules and regulations shall be in addition to the existing applicable safety orders and will be concerned with engineering force stresses, safety devices, and preventative maintenance. Nothing in this chapter shall limit the authority of the division to prescribe or enforce general or special safety orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 705, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7903.

The division or a public entity shall not issue the original certificate of inspection for an amusement ride until it receives certification in writing by an engineer qualified under the Civil and Professional Engineers Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) that such amusement ride meets the requirements established by the division for amusement rides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7904.

(a) The division shall fix and collect all fees necessary to cover the cost of administering this part. Fees shall be charged to a person or entity receiving the division’s services as provided by this part, as set out in regulations adopted pursuant to this part, including, but not limited to, approvals, determinations, permits, investigations, inspections and reinspections, certifications and recertifications, receipt and review of certificates, and reports and inspections. In fixing the amount of these fees, the division may include direct costs and a reasonable percentage attributable to the indirect costs of the division for administering this part. All fees collected by the division under this section shall be deposited into the Occupational
 Safety and Health Fund to support the division’s portable amusement ride inspection program.

(b) Any fees required pursuant to this section shall be set forth in regulations. For the 2016–17 fiscal year, those regulations shall be adopted as emergency regulations. These emergency regulations shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act provided for in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. These emergency regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State. 

(c) The division shall annually prepare and post on its Internet Web site a report summarizing all inspections of amusement rides and accidents occurring on amusement rides. This report may contain route location
 information submitted to the division by permit applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 223.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7905.

The division may hire inspectors to inspect amusement rides. The division shall cause the inspection provided by this part to be made by its safety inspectors, or by a qualified inspector who is approved by the division and employed by an insurance company or a public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 705, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

7906.

No person shall operate an amusement ride without a permit issued by the division or a public entity. On or before March 1 of each year an operator shall apply for a permit to the division or a public entity on a form furnished by the division and containing such information as the division may require. Each application shall specifically include a route list for the ride for the permit year, which shall include the name of each town or city, street location, and dates of operation of the ride at each location. A route list may be revised at any time, but a ride may not be operated at a particular location unless notification of the revision has been given previously to the division or public entity issuing the permit.

All amusement rides shall be inspected before they are originally put into operation for the public’s use and thereafter at least once every year, unless authorized to operate on a temporary permit. Amusement rides may also be inspected each time they are disassembled and reassembled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 705, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

7907.

If, after inspection, an amusement ride is found to comply with the rules and regulations of the division, the division or a public entity shall issue a permit to operate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7908.

Before a new amusement ride is erected, or whenever any additions or alterations are made which change the structure, mechanism, classification, or capacity of any amusement ride, the operator shall file with the division or a public entity a notice of his intention and any plans or diagrams requested by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7909.

The division may order cessation of operation of an amusement ride and permit revocation if it has been determined after inspection to be hazardous or unsafe. Operation shall not resume until such conditions are corrected to the satisfaction of the division

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 705, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7910.

This part shall not be construed to prevent the use of any existing installation which upon inspection is found to be in a safe condition and in conformance with the rules and regulations of the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7911.

If there are practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships for an operator to comply with the rules and regulations under this part, the division may modify the application of such rules or regulations if the spirit of the rules and regulations shall be observed and the public safety is secure. Any operator may make a written request to the division stating his grounds and applying for such modification. Any authorization by the division shall be in writing and shall describe the conditions under which the modifications are permitted. A record of all modifications shall be kept in the division and open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7912.

No person shall operate an amusement ride unless there is in existence and on file with the division a policy of insurance, issued by a company licensed by the Department of Insurance to do business in the state, or by a nonadmitted insurer employed by a surplus lines broker licensed by the Department of Insurance, in an amount of not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) until January 1, 2009, and, effective on and after January 1, 2009, one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence insuring the owner or operator against liability for injury suffered by persons riding the amusement ride.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7913.

Nothing contained in this part shall prevent cities, counties, and cities and counties from regulating carnivals or amusement rides, nor prevent them from enacting legislation more restrictive than this part with respect to carnivals or amusement rides.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1113.)
-------------------------------------------

7914.

(a) An operator of an amusement ride shall report or cause to be reported to the division immediately by telephone each known incident where the maintenance, operation, or use of the amusement ride results in any of the following:

(1) A fatality.

(2) A loss of consciousness or other injury to a person which requires medical service other than ordinary first aid treatment.

(3) Major mechanical failure. For purposes of this section, “major mechanical failure” means the stoppage of operation resulting from or in a structural failure, a mechanical or electrical failure of a drive or control system component, or a failure of a restraint system that significantly compromises ride safety. “Major mechanical failure” does not include a foreseeable malfunction that activates a safety system.

(4) A patron falling from a moving ride or from a ride that has temporarily stopped in an elevated position.

(b) If a fatality, reportable injury, or major mechanical failure, as defined in subdivision (a),is caused by the failure, malfunction, or operation of an amusement ride, the equipment or conditions that caused the accident shall be preserved for the purpose of investigation by the division.

(c) In addition to the report by telephone required under subdivision (a), an operator of an amusement ride shall submit a written accident report to the division within 24 hours of an incident on a form designated by the division.

(d) A division inspector may inspect an amusement ride upon receipt of the report of an incident.

 (e) Whenever a state, county, or local fire or police agency is called to an accident involving an amusement ride covered by this part in which a serious injury or illness, or death occurs, the nearest office of the division shall be notified by telephone immediately by the responding agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7915.

(a) Any owner or operator of any amusement ride who fails to comply with any provision of this part or any rule, regulation, or safety order adopted pursuant to this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) Whenever an owner or operator of any amusement ride fails to pay any fee required under Section 7904 within 60 days after notification, the owner or operator shall pay, in addition to the fee required, a penalty fee equal to 100 percent of the required fee. For purposes of this section, the date of the invoice shall be considered the date of notification.

 (c) The division shall not issue any permit to any owner or operator of any amusement ride who fails to pay any fee until the fee is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7916.

(a) An owner of an amusement ride shall provide training for its employees in the safe operation and maintenance of amusement rides, as required by Sections 4, 6, 7, and 8 of ASTM F770-06, Standard Practice for Ownership and Operation of Amusement Rides and Devices, adopted by the American Society for Testing and Materials, as amended or as may be amended from time to time and as the division deems appropriate, and the injury prevention program required under Section 6401.7.

(b) The owner of an amusement ride shall maintain all of the records necessary to demonstrate that the requirements of subdivision (a) have been met, including employee training records and maintenance, repair, inspection, and injury and illness records for each amusement ride, as specified in ASTM F770-06 referenced in subdivision (a). On and after January 1, 2009, the owner of an amusement ride shall make the records available to a division inspector upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7917.

If the division determines that an owner or operator of an amusement ride subject to this part has willfully or intentionally violated this part or a rule or regulation promulgated under this part, and that the violation resulted in a death or reportable injury as specified in Section 7914, the division shall impose on that owner or operator a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7918.

The division shall enforce this part by the issuance of a citation and notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with that specified in Section 6317 or in some other manner as deemed appropriate by the division. An owner or operator who receives a citation and penalty may appeal the citation and penalty to the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board in a manner consistent with that specified in Section 6319.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

7919.

The division shall adopt rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this part, including, the reporting requirements established under Section 7914.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 478, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8.1. PERMANENT AMUSEMENT RIDE SAFETY INSPECTION PROGRAM [7920. - 7932.]

7920.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to create a state system for the inspection of permanent amusement rides. This part shall be known and may be cited as the Permanent Amusement Ride Safety Inspection Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7921.

As used in this part:

(a) “Permanent amusement ride” means a mechanical device, aquatic device, or combination of devices, of a permanent nature that carries or conveys passengers along, around, or over a fixed or restricted route or course for the purpose of giving its passengers amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement. “Permanent amusement ride” includes the business of operating bungee jumping services or providing services to facilitate bungee jumping, but does not include slides, playground equipment, coin-operated devices or conveyances that operate directly on the ground or on a surface or pavement directly on the ground. The division shall determine the specific devices that are permanent amusement rides for the purposes of this part. This determination shall be made to apply equally to all operators of similar or identical rides and shall be made pursuant to a procedure promulgated by the standards board.

(b) “Operator” or “owner” means a person who owns or controls or has the duty to control the operation of an amusement ride. It includes the state and every state agency, and each county, city, district, and all public and quasi-public corporations and public agencies therein.

(c) “Qualified safety inspector” means either of the following:

(1) A person who holds a valid professional engineer license issued by this state or issued by an equivalent licensing body in another state, and who has been approved by the division as a qualified safety inspector for permanent amusement rides.

(2) A person who documents to the satisfaction of the division that he or she meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The person has a minimum of five years experience in the amusement ride field, at least two years of which were involved in actual amusement ride inspection with a manufacturer, government agency, amusement park, carnival, or insurance underwriter.

(B) The person completes not less than 15 hours per year of continuing education at a school approved by the division, which education shall include inservice industry or manufacturer updates and seminars.

(C) The person has completed at least 80 hours of formal education during the past five years from a school approved by the division for amusement ride safety. Nondestructive-testing training, as determined by the division, may be substituted for up to one-half of the 80 hours of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7922.

This part does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any playground operated by a school or local government if the playground is an incidental amenity and the operating entity is not primarily engaged in providing amusement, pleasure, thrills, or excitement.

(b) Museums or other institutions principally devoted to the exhibition of products of agriculture, industry, education, science, religion, or the arts.

(c) Skating rinks, arcades, laser or paint ball war games, indoor interactive arcade games, bowling alleys, miniature golf courses, mechanical bulls, inflatable rides, trampolines, ball crawls, exercise equipment, jet skis, paddle boats, air boats, helicopters, airplanes, parasails, hot air balloons, whether tethered or untethered, theaters, amphitheaters, batting cages, stationary spring-mounted fixtures, rider-propelled merry-go-rounds, games, slide shows, live animal rides, or live animal shows.

(d) Permanent amusement rides operated at a private event that are not open to the general public and not subject to a separate admission charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7923.

(a) The division shall formulate and propose rules and regulations for adoption by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board for the safe installation, repair, maintenance, use, operation, and inspection of all permanent amusement rides as the division finds necessary for the protection of the general public using permanent amusement rides. The rules and regulations shall be in addition to the existing applicable safety orders and will be concerned with engineering force stresses, safety devices, and preventative maintenance. Nothing in this part shall limit the authority of the division to prescribe or enforce general or special safety orders.

(b) It is the Legislature’s intent that the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this part be consistent with those adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board for traveling amusement rides, to the extent that those rules and regulations are found to be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7924.

(a) On an annual basis, an owner of a permanent amusement ride shall submit to the division a certificate of compliance on a form prescribed by the division, which shall include the following:

(1) The legal name and address of the owner and his or her representative, if any, and the primary place of business of the owner.

(2) A description of, the name of the manufacturer of, and, if given by the manufacturer, the serial number and model number of, the permanent amusement ride.

(3) A written declaration, executed by a qualified safety inspector, stating
 that, within the preceding 12-month period, the permanent amusement ride was inspected by the qualified safety inspector and that the permanent amusement ride is in material conformance with this section and all applicable rules and regulations adopted by the division and standards board.

(b) The owner of multiple permanent amusement rides at a single site may submit a single certificate of compliance that provides the information required by subdivision (a) for each permanent amusement ride at that site.

(c) A certificate of compliance shall not be required until one year following the promulgation of any rules or regulations by the division governing the submission of the certificates.

(d) A person shall not operate a permanent amusement ride that was inspected by a qualified safety inspector or division inspector
 and found to be unsafe unless all necessary repairs or modifications, or both, to the ride have been completed and certified as completed by a qualified safety inspector.

(e) For the purposes of satisfying this section, a qualified safety inspector shall meet the requirements in subdivision (c) of Section 7921 and shall be certified by the division. A qualified safety inspector shall be recertified every two years following his or her initial certification. A qualified safety inspector may be an in-house, full-time safety inspector of the owner of the permanent amusement ride, an employee or agent of the insurance underwriter or insurance broker of the permanent amusement ride, an employee or agent of the manufacturer of the amusement ride, or an independent consultant or contractor.

(f) The owner of a permanent amusement ride shall maintain all of the records necessary to
 demonstrate that the requirements of this section have been met, including, but not limited to, employee training records, maintenance, repair, and inspection records for each permanent amusement ride, and records of accidents of which the operator has knowledge, that resulted from the failure, malfunction, or operation of a permanent amusement ride and that required medical service other than ordinary first aid, and shall make those records available to a division inspector upon request. The owner shall make those records available for inspection by the division during normal business hours at the owner’s permanent place of business. The owner or representative of the owner may be present when the division inspects the records. The division shall conduct an inspection of the operation of each ride at the permanent amusement park in conjunction with an inspection of records conducted pursuant to this subdivision, except that the division is not required to conduct an operational inspection of a ride pursuant
 to this subdivision if a qualified safety inspector employed by the division has already inspected the operation of that ride in connection with the execution of the current annual certificate of compliance pursuant to subdivision (a). 

(g) Upon receipt of a certificate of compliance, the division shall notify the owner of the permanent amusement ride or rides for which a certificate is submitted whether the certificate meets all the requirements of this section, and if not, what requirements must still be met.

(h) The division shall, in addition to the annual inspection performed by the division pursuant to subdivision (f), inspect the records for a permanent amusement ride or the ride, or both, under either of the following circumstances:

(1) The division finds that the certificate of
 compliance submitted pursuant to this section for the ride is fraudulent.

(2) The division determines, pursuant to regulations it has adopted, that a permanent amusement ride has a disproportionately high incidence of accidents required to be reported pursuant to Section 7925.

(i) The division shall conduct its inspections with the least disruption to the normal operation of the permanent park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 224.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7925.

(a) Each operator of a permanent amusement ride shall report or cause to be reported to the division immediately by telephone each known accident where maintenance, operation, or use of the permanent amusement ride results in a death or serious injury to any person unless the injury does not require medical service other than ordinary first aid. If a death or serious injury results from the failure, malfunction, or operation of a permanent amusement ride, the equipment or conditions that caused the accident shall be preserved for the purpose of an investigation by the division.

(b) A division inspector may inspect any permanent amusement ride after the report of an accident to the division. The division may order a cessation of operation of a permanent amusement ride if it is determined after inspection to be hazardous or unsafe. Operation shall not resume until these conditions are corrected to the satisfaction of the division.

(c) Whenever a state, county, or local fire or police agency is called to an accident involving a permanent amusement ride covered by this part where a serious injury or death occurs, the nearest office of the division shall be notified by telephone immediately by the responding agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7926.

(a) A person may operate a permanent amusement ride only if, at the time of operation, one of the following is in existence:

(1) The owner of the permanent amusement ride provides an insurance policy in an amount not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence insuring the owner or operator against liability for injury or death to persons arising out of the use of the permanent amusement ride.

(2) The owner of the permanent amusement ride provides a bond in an amount not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), except that the aggregate liability of the surety under that bond shall not exceed the face amount of the bond.

(3) The owner of a permanent amusement ride meets a financial test of self-insurance, as prescribed by rules and regulations promulgated by the division, to demonstrate financial responsibility covering liability for injury suffered by patrons riding the permanent amusement ride.

(b) The insurance policy or bond shall be obtained from one or more insurers or sureties licensed by the Department of Insurance to do business in this state, or by a nonadmitted insurer employed by a surplus lines broker licensed by the Department of Insurance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7927.

Each owner of a permanent amusement ride shall provide training for its employees in the safe operation and maintenance of amusement rides, as required by the standards adopted by the American Society for Testing Materials, Committee F770-03, Section 4.1.3, and Committee F853-93, Section 6.2, as amended or as may be amended from time to time, and the injury prevention program required under Section 6401.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7928.

The division shall adopt rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this part. The division may employ qualified safety inspectors as necessary for the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7929.

(a) The division shall fix and collect all fees necessary to cover the cost to the division of administering this part. Fees shall be charged to a person or entity receiving the division’s services as provided by this part, as set out in regulations adopted pursuant to this part, including, but not limited to, approvals, determinations, certifications and recertifications, receipt and review of certificates, and inspections. In fixing the amount of these fees, the division may include direct costs and a reasonable percentage attributable to the indirect costs of the division for administering this part. Notwithstanding Section 6103 of the Government Code, the division may collect these fees from the state or any county, city, district, or other
 political subdivision.

(b) All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Occupational Safety and Health Fund to support the Permanent Amusement Ride Safety Inspection Program.

(c) Whenever a person owning or having custody, management, or operation of a permanent amusement ride fails to pay any fee required under this part within 60 days after the date of notification by the division, the division shall assess a penalty equal to 100 percent of the initial fee. For purposes of this section, the date of the invoice fixing the fee shall be considered the date of notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 225.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7930.

If the division determines that any owner or operator of a permanent amusement ride subject to this part has willfully or intentionally violated this part or any rule or regulation promulgated under this part, and that violation results in a death or serious injury as specified in Section 7925, the division shall impose on that owner or operator a civil penalty of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and not more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7931.

The division shall enforce this part by the issuance of a citation and notice of civil penalty in a manner consistent with Section 6317. Any owner or operator who receives a citation and penalty may appeal the citation and penalty to the Occupational Safety and Health Appeals Board in a manner consistent with Section 6319.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7932.

(a) The provisions of this part relating to annual division inspections shall not apply to any permanent amusement ride located within a county or other political subdivision of the state that, as of April 1, 1998, has adopted the provisions of Chapter 66 (commencing with Section 6601.1) of the 1994 Uniform Building Code providing for the routine inspection of permanent amusement rides by the county or other political subdivision of the state, provided that the division determines that these inspections meet or exceed the inspection standards set forth in this part.

(b) If the county or other political subdivision suspends, revokes, or otherwise vacates its standards for permanent amusement rides, any permanent amusement ride located within the county or other political subdivision shall be subject to the inspection standards set forth in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. TUNNEL AND MINE SAFETY [7950. - 8004.]



  CHAPTER 1. Tunnels and Mines [7950. - 7964.5.]

7950.

This part shall be known and may be cited as “The Tom Carrell Memorial Tunnel and Mine Safety Act of 1972.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7951.

As used in this part:

(a) Tunnel shall include excavation, construction, alteration, repairing, renovating, or demolishing of any tunnel except tunnel work covered under the compressed air safety orders adopted by the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board and manhole construction.

(b) “Tunnel” means an underground passageway, excavated by men and equipment working below the earth’s surface, that provides a subterranean route along which men, equipment, or substances can move.

(c) “Mine” means any excavation or opening above or below ground used for removal of ore, minerals, gravel, sand, rock, or other materials intended for manufacturing or sale. It shall include quarries and open pit operations, other than a gravel pit or other pit where material is removed by a contractor or other person for his own use and not for sale to others. The term “mine” shall not include a mine that is operated exclusively by persons having a proprietary interest in such mine or by persons who are paid only a share of the profits from the mine, nor shall it include during any calendar year, any mine that produced less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) in ore, minerals, sand, rock, or other material during the preceding calendar year.

(d) “Access shaft” means a vertical shaft used as a regular means of worker access to underground mines and tunnels under construction, renovation, or demolition.

(e) “Lower explosive limit” means the lowest concentration at which a gas or vapor can be ignited or will explode.

(f) “Face” means the head of the tunnel where soil is being removed, or that area in a mine where digging is underway.

(g) “Muck” means excavated dirt, rock, or other material.

(h) “Permissible equipment” means equipment tested and approved by the U.S. Bureau of Mines or acceptable to other authorities recognized by the division, and acceptable by the division, which is safe for use in gassy or extrahazardous tunnels or underground mines.

(i) “Division” means the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(j) “Board” means the Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.

(k) “Underground mine” means a mine that consists of a subterranean excavation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

7952.

There shall be within the division a separate unit of safety engineers trained to inspect all tunnel construction and mine operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7953.

Sufficient manpower shall be maintained to provide for four annual inspections of underground mines, one inspection of surface mines or quarries annually, and six inspections of tunnels under construction annually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7954.

To assist the unit of safety engineers in determining the safety of tunnel construction and mine operation, the division shall make available at least one industrial hygiene engineer and one chemist. A laboratory for analysis of dust, gas, vapors, soil, or other materials shall be available to members of this unit. Contracts to provide for geological and other services may be signed by the division whenever it is necessary to assure safety for employees engaged in mining or tunnel work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

7955.

The division and the owner of a mine, if he is not the operator of the mine, shall be notified before any initial mining operation or construction may be started at any mines or tunnels. A prejob safety conference shall be held with an authorized representative of the division for all underground operations. Representatives of the tunnel or mine owner, the employer, and employees shall be included in the prejob safety conference.

The division shall classify all tunnels or underground mines operating on the effective date of this section, or which commence operation thereafter, as one of the classifications set forth in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive. Such classification shall be made prior to the request for bids on all public works projects, whenever possible. This shall not, however, prevent the division from reclassifying such mines or tunnels when conditions warrant it.
